dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
SFX xY àer arave-ƚo/I8 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third cl:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xY àer arae-lo/I6 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third cl:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xY àer arae-ƚo/I8 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third cl:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xY àer aríe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX xY àer aree tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX xY àer arèe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX xY àer arove tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer aroe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer arove tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer aroe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer arove tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer aroe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer arove tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer aroe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer arove/I5 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer aroe/I5 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xY àer arou tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX xY àer aree/I1 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX xY àer arèe/I1 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX xY àer aríe tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX xY àer arou tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX xY àer arou tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX xY àer arou tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX xY àer arou/I5 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + róu
SFX xY àer aroo tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róo
SFX xY àer aroo tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róo
SFX xY àer aroo tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róo
SFX xY àer aroo tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róo
SFX xY àer aroo/I5 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + róo
SFX xY àer aró tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró
SFX xY àer aró tràer	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró
SFX xY àer aró tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró
SFX xY àer aró tràer	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró
SFX xY àer aró/I5 tràer	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró
SFX xY àer emo/P0P1 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xY àer emo-ƚo/P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xY àer imo/P0P1 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xY àer imo-ƚo/P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xY àer on/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + ón, belumat
SFX xY àer en/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + én, liventin
SFX xY er 0/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:second is:singular	# T9
SFX xY àer é/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xY àer í/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xY àer è/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é), ŧenedexe
SFX xY àer ar/P0P1P2 tràer	vt:infinitive+simple	# T1 + r(e)
SFX xY àer are tràer	vt:infinitive+simple	# T1 + r(e), padoan/coxòto
SFX xY àer ato/M2F0F3A0 tràer	vt:participle+passive+strong
SFX xY àer asto/M2F0F3A0 tràer	vt:participle+passive+strong
