dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
tràer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xY@0-0-1:0^9.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
astràer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xY	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:abs
estràer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xY	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:ex
sotràer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xY	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:sub
subtràer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xY	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:sub
sutràer/T5T6L5l5W3w3P0P1P2xY	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple dp:sub
